Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201580-104
Veterans; burial by county veterans service committee; when authorized; surviving relatives may conduct funeral.

Except for cremated remains disposed of as provided in section 71-1382.01, it shall be the duty of the county veterans service committee to cause to be decently interred the body of any person who has been discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions) from any arm of the military or naval service of the United States, has served during a period of war, as defined in section 80-401.01, or during a period of actual hostilities in any war or conflict in which the United States Government was engaged prior to April 6, 1917, and may hereafter die without leaving sufficient means to defray his or her funeral expenses. Such burials should not be made in any cemetery or burial grounds used exclusively for the burial of pauper dead. If surviving relatives of the deceased shall desire to conduct the funeral, they shall be permitted to do so.

Laws 1885, c. 39, § 1, p. 214;

Laws 1905, c. 146, § 1, p. 589;

R.S.1913, § 7158;

C.S.1922, § 6804;

C.S.1929, § 80-107;

R.S.1943, § 80-104;

Laws 1953, c. 324, § 4, p. 1072;

Laws 1959, c. 420, § 1, p. 1415;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 22;

Laws 2015, LB146, § 5.